Alabama, session 2026rs, HB71.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 22-19-85, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§22-19-85
(a) Unless directed otherwise by the Governor, the
Attorney General, a district attorney, or an order of a
circuit court judge, a medical examiner performing his or her
duties in any county in this state as provided under existing
law, including a medical examiner employed by the Department
of Forensic Sciences, shall notify the next of kin, through
the appropriate law enforcement agency, when retaining a
deceased person's individual's entire organ or organs for
additional testing that is required to determine
identification or the cause or manner of death.
(b) A medical examiner performing his or her duties in
any county in this state as provided under existing law,
including a medical examiner employed by the Department of
Forensic Sciences, is prohibited from retaining shall not
retain a deceased person's individual's entire organ or organs
for research or any other purpose not in conjunction with a
determination of identification or cause or manner of death
without notification to, and approval by, the appropriate next
of kin.
(c) A violation of this section is a Class C felony."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2